Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,105
Chart order; contents.

A chart order must contain the following information: Patient's name; date of the order; name of the drug, device, or biological; strength of the drug or biological, if applicable; directions for administration to the patient, including the dose to be given; and prescribing practitioner's name.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 56.